Ohio, session 136, HB414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.645 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.645. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the portion of the road known as 8
state route number one hundred sixty-three, running in an 9
easterly and westerly direction, commencing at the intersection 10
of that route and Lightner road and extending to the 11
intersection of that route and Hartshorn road, in Ottawa county, 12
shall be known as the "Navy Seaman Jadwisiak Memorial Highway." 13
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 14
along the highway indicating its name. 15